Illinois, session 104th, HB3799.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Sections 132, 132.3, 143.15, and 143.17 and by adding 6Article XLVIII as follows: 7    (215 ILCS 5/132)  (from Ch. 73, par. 744)8    Sec. 132. Market conduct actions and market analysis. 9    (a) Definitions. As used in this Section:10    "Data call" means a written solicitation by the Director 11to 2 or more regulated companies or persons seeking existing 12data or other existing information to be provided within a 13reasonable time period for a narrow and targeted regulatory 14oversight purpose for market analysis. "Data call" does not 15include an information request in a market conduct action or 16any data or information that the Director shall or may 17specifically require under any other law, except as provided 18by the other law. 19    "Desk examination" means an examination that is conducted 20by market conduct surveillance personnel at a location other 21than the regulated company's or person's premises. "Desk 22examination" includes an examination performed at the 23Department's offices with the company or person providing   HB3799 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1requested documents by hard copy, microfiche, or discs or 2other electronic media for review without an on-site 3examination.4    "Market analysis" means a process whereby market conduct 5surveillance personnel collect and analyze information from 6filed schedules, surveys, required reports, data calls, and 7other sources to develop a baseline understanding of the 8marketplace and to identify patterns or practices of regulated 9persons that deviate significantly from the norm or that may 10pose a potential risk to insurance consumers.11    "Market conduct action" means any activity, other than 12market analysis, that the Director may initiate to assess and 13address the market and nonfinancial practices of regulated 14persons, including market conduct examinations. The 15Department's consumer complaint process outlined in 50 Ill. 16Adm. Code 926 is not a market conduct action for purposes of 17this Section; however, the Department may initiate market 18conduct actions based on information gathered during that 19process. "Market conduct action" includes:20        (1) correspondence with the company or person;21        (2) interviews with the company or person;22        (3) information gathering;23        (4) policy and procedure reviews;24        (5) interrogatories;25        (6) review of company or person self-evaluations and 26    voluntary compliance programs;  HB3799 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1        (7) self-audits; and2        (8) market conduct examinations.3    "Market conduct examination" or "examination" means any 4type of examination, other than a financial examination, that 5assesses a regulated person's compliance with the laws, rules, 6and regulations applicable to the examinee. "Market conduct 7examination" includes comprehensive examinations, targeted 8examinations, and follow-up examinations, which may be 9conducted as desk examinations, on-site examinations, or a 10combination of those 2 methods.11    "Market conduct surveillance" means market analysis or a 12market conduct action.13    "Market conduct surveillance personnel" means those 14individuals employed or retained by the Department and 15designated by the Director to collect, analyze, review, or act 16on information in the insurance marketplace that identifies 17patterns or practices of persons subject to the Director's 18jurisdiction. "Market conduct surveillance personnel" includes 19all persons identified as an examiner in the insurance laws or 20rules of this State if the Director has designated them to 21assist her or him in ascertaining the nonfinancial business 22practices, performance, and operations of a company or person 23subject to the Director's jurisdiction.24    "On-site examination" means an examination conducted at 25the company's or person's home office or the location where 26the records under review are stored.  HB3799 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    "SOFR rate" means the Secured Overnight Financing Rate 2published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York every 3business day.4    (b) Companies and persons subject to surveillance. The 5Director, for the purposes of ascertaining the nonfinancial 6business practices, performance, and operations of any person 7subject to the Director's jurisdiction or within the 8marketplace, may engage in market conduct actions or market 9analysis relating to:10        (1) any company transacting or being organized to 11    transact business in this State;12        (2) any person engaged in or proposing to be engaged 13    in the organization, promotion, or solicitation of shares 14    or capital contributions to or aiding in the formation of 15    a company;16        (3) any person having a written or oral contract 17    pertaining to the management or control of a company as 18    general agent, managing agent, or attorney-in-fact;19        (4) any licensed or registered producer, firm, 20    pharmacy benefit manager, administrator, or any person 21    making application for any license, certificate, or 22    registration;23        (5) any person engaged in the business of adjusting 24    losses or financing premiums; or25        (6) any person, organization, trust, or corporation 26    having custody or control of information reasonably   HB3799 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    related to the operation, performance, or conduct of a 2    company or person subject to the Director's jurisdiction, 3    but only as to the operation, performance, or conduct of a 4    company or person subject to the Director's jurisdiction.5    (c) Market analysis and market conduct actions.6        (1) The Director may perform market analysis by 7    gathering and analyzing information from data currently 8    available to the Director, information from surveys, data 9    call responses, or reports that are submitted to the 10    Director, information collected by the NAIC, and 11    information from a variety of other sources to develop a 12    baseline understanding of the marketplace and to identify 13    for further review companies or practices that deviate 14    from the norm or that may pose a potential risk to 15    insurance consumers. The Director shall use the most 16    recent NAIC Market Regulation Handbook as a guide in 17    performing market analysis. The Director may also employ 18    other guidelines or procedures as the Director may deem 19    appropriate.20        (2) The Director may initiate a market conduct action 21    subject to the following:22            (A) If the Director determines that further 23        inquiry into a particular person or practice is 24        needed, then the Director may consider undertaking a 25        market conduct action. The Director shall inform the 26        examinee of the initiation of the market conduct   HB3799 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1        action and shall use the most recent NAIC Market 2        Regulation Handbook as a guide in performing the 3        market conduct action. The Director may also employ 4        other guidelines or procedures as the Director may 5        deem appropriate.6            (B) For an examination, the Director shall conduct 7        a pre-examination conference with the examinee to 8        clarify expectations before commencement of the 9        examination. At the pre-examination conference, the 10        Director or the market conduct surveillance personnel 11        shall disclose the basis of the examination, including 12        the statutes, regulations, or business practices at 13        issue. The Director shall provide at least 30 days' 14        advance notice of the date of the pre-examination 15        conference unless circumstances warrant that the 16        examination proceed more quickly.17            (C) The Director may coordinate a market conduct 18        action and findings of this State with market conduct 19        actions and findings of other states. 20        (3) Nothing in this Section requires the Director to 21    undertake market analysis before initiating any market 22    conduct action.23        (4) Nothing in this Section restricts the Director to 24    the type of market conduct action he or she initially 25    selected.26        (5) A regulated person is required to respond to a   HB3799 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    market analysis data call or to an information request in 2    a market conduct action on the terms and conditions 3    established by the Director. The Department shall 4    establish reasonable timelines that are commensurate with 5    the volume and nature of the data required to be collected 6    in the information request.7        (6) Without limiting the contents of any examination 8    report, market conduct actions taken as a result of a 9    market analysis shall focus primarily on the general 10    business practices and compliance activities of companies 11    or persons rather than identifying infrequent or 12    unintentional random errors that do not cause significant 13    consumer harm. The Director may give a company or person 14    an opportunity to resolve matters that are identified as a 15    result of a market analysis to the Director's satisfaction 16    before undertaking a market conduct action against the 17    company or person. 18    (d) Access to books and records. Every examinee and its 19officers, directors, and agents must provide to the Director 20convenient and free access at all reasonable hours at its 21office or location to all books, records, and documents and 22any or all papers relating to the business, performance, 23operations, and affairs of the examinee or its affiliates. The 24officers, directors, and agents of the examinee must 25facilitate the market conduct action and aid in the action so 26far as it is in their power to do so. The Director and any   HB3799 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1authorized market conduct surveillance personnel have the 2power to administer oaths and examine under oath any person 3relevant to the business of the examinee. A failure to produce 4requested books, records, or documents by the deadline shall 5not be a violation until after the later of:6        (1) 5 business days after the initial response 7    deadline set by the Director or authorized personnel; or8        (2) an extended deadline granted by the Director or 9    authorized personnel.10    (e) Examination report. The market conduct surveillance 11personnel designated by the Director under Section 402 must 12make a full and true report of every examination made by them 13that contains only facts ascertained from the books, papers, 14records, documents, and other evidence obtained by 15investigation and examined by them or ascertained from the 16testimony of officers, agents, or other persons examined under 17oath concerning the business, affairs, conduct, and 18performance of the examinee. The report of examination must be 19verified by the oath of the examiner in charge thereof, and 20when so verified is prima facie evidence in any action or 21proceeding in the name of the State against the examinee, its 22officers, directors, or agents upon the facts stated therein.23    (f) Examinee response to examination report. The 24Department and the examinee shall comply with the following 25timeline, unless a mutual agreement is reached to modify the 26timeline:  HB3799 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1        (1) The Department shall deliver a draft report to the 2    examinee as soon as reasonably practicable. Nothing in 3    this Section prevents the Department from sharing an 4    earlier draft of the report with the examinee before 5    confirming that the examination is completed.6        (2) If the examinee chooses to respond with written 7    submissions or rebuttals, then the examinee must do so 8    within 30 days after receipt of any draft report delivered 9    after the completion of the examination.10        (3) As soon as reasonably practicable after receipt of 11    any written submissions or rebuttals, the Department shall 12    issue a final report. Whenever the Department has made 13    substantive changes to a previously shared draft report, 14    unless those changes remove part or all of an alleged 15    violation or were proposed by the examinee, the Department 16    shall deliver the revised version to the examinee as a new 17    draft and shall allow the examinee 30 days to respond 18    before the Department issues a final report.19        (4) The examinee shall, within 10 days after the 20    issuance of the final report, accept the final report or 21    request a hearing in writing, unless granted an extension 22    by mutual agreement. Failure to take either action within 23    10 days or the mutually agreed extension shall be deemed 24    an acceptance of the final report. If the examinee accepts 25    the examination report, the Director shall continue to 26    hold the content of the examination report as private and   HB3799 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    confidential for a period of 30 days. Thereafter, the 2    Director shall open the final report for public 3    inspection.4    (g) Hearing; final examination report. Notwithstanding 5anything to the contrary in this Code or Department rules, if 6the examinee requests a hearing, then the following procedures 7apply:8        (1) The examinee must request the hearing in writing 9    and must specify the issues in the final report that the 10    examinee is challenging. The examinee is limited to 11    challenging the issues that were previously challenged in 12    the examinee's written submission and rebuttal or 13    supplemental submission and rebuttal pursuant to 14    paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (f).15        (2) Except as permitted in paragraphs (3) and (8) of 16    this subsection, the hearing shall be limited to the 17    written arguments submitted by the parties to the 18    designated hearing officer. The designated hearing officer 19    may, however, grant a live hearing upon the request of 20    either party.21        (3) Discovery is limited to the market conduct 22    surveillance personnel's work papers that are relevant to 23    the issues the examinee is challenging. The relevant 24    market conduct surveillance personnel's work papers shall 25    be admitted into the record. No other forms of discovery, 26    including depositions and interrogatories, are allowed,   HB3799 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    except upon written agreement of the examinee and the 2    Department when necessary to conduct a fair hearing or as 3    otherwise provided in this subsection.4        (4) Only the examinee and the Department may submit 5    written arguments.6        (5) The examinee must submit its written argument and 7    any supporting evidence within 30 days after the 8    Department serves a formal notice of hearing.9        (6) The Department must submit its written response 10    and any supporting evidence within 30 days after the 11    examinee submits its written argument.12        (7) The designated hearing officer may allow 13    additional written submissions if necessary or useful to 14    the fair resolution of the hearing.15        (8) If either the examinee or the Department submit 16    written testimony or affidavits, then the opposing party 17    shall be given the opportunity to cross-examine the 18    witness and to submit the cross-examination to the hearing 19    officer before a decision.20        (9) The Director shall issue a decision accompanied by 21    findings and conclusions. The Director's order is a final 22    administrative decision and shall be served upon the 23    examinee together with a copy of the final report within 24    90 days after the conclusion of the hearing. The hearing 25    is deemed concluded on the later of the last date of any 26    live hearing or the final deadline date for written   HB3799 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    submissions to the hearing officer, including any 2    continuances or supplemental briefings permitted by the 3    hearing officer.4        (10) Any portion of the final examination report that 5    was not challenged by the examinee is incorporated into 6    the decision of the Director.7        (11) Findings of fact and conclusions of law in the 8    Director's final administrative decision are prima facie 9    evidence in any legal or regulatory action.10        (12) If an examinee has requested a hearing, then the 11    Director shall continue to hold the final report and any 12    related decision as private and confidential for a period 13    of 49 days after the final administrative decision. After 14    the 49-day period expires, the Director shall open the 15    final report and any related decision for public 16    inspection if a court of competent jurisdiction has not 17    stayed its publication.18    (h) Disclosure. So long as the recipient agrees to and 19verifies in writing its legal authority to hold the 20information confidential in a manner consistent with this 21Section, nothing in this Section prevents the Director from 22disclosing at any time the content of an examination report, 23preliminary examination report, or results, or any matter 24relating to a report or results, to:25        (1) the insurance regulatory authorities of any other 26    state; or  HB3799 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1        (2) any agency or office of the federal government.2    (i) Confidentiality.3        (1) The Director and any other person in the course of 4    market conduct surveillance shall keep confidential all 5    documents, including working papers, third-party models, 6    or products; complaint logs; copies of any documents 7    created, produced, obtained by, or disclosed to the 8    Director, market conduct surveillance personnel, or any 9    other person in the course of market conduct surveillance 10    conducted pursuant to this Section; and all documents 11    obtained by the NAIC pursuant to this Section. The 12    documents shall remain confidential after the termination 13    of the market conduct surveillance, are not subject to 14    subpoena, are not subject to discovery or admissible as 15    evidence in private civil litigation, are not subject to 16    disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act, and must 17    not be made public at any time or used by the Director or 18    any other person, except as provided in paragraphs (3), 19    (4), and (6) of this subsection (i) and in subsection (k).20        (2) The Director and any other person in the course of 21    market conduct surveillance shall keep confidential any 22    self-evaluation or voluntary compliance program documents 23    disclosed to the Director or other person by an examinee 24    and the data collected via the NAIC market conduct annual 25    statement. The documents are not subject to subpoena, are 26    not subject to discovery or admissible as evidence in   HB3799 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    private civil litigation, are not subject to disclosure 2    under the Freedom of Information Act, and they shall not 3    be made public or used by the Director or any other person, 4    except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this 5    subsection (i), in subsection (k), or in Section 155.35. 6    Nothing in this Section shall supersede the restrictions 7    on disclosure under Section 155.35.8        (3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2) of this 9    subsection (i), and consistent with paragraph (5) of this 10    subsection (i), in order to assist in the performance of 11    the Director's duties, the Director may:12            (A) share documents, materials, communications, or 13        other information, including the confidential and 14        privileged documents, materials, or information 15        described in this subsection (i), with other State, 16        federal, alien, and international regulatory agencies 17        and law enforcement authorities and the NAIC, its 18        affiliates, and subsidiaries, if the recipient agrees 19        to and verifies in writing its legal authority to 20        maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of 21        the document, material, communication, or other 22        information;23            (B) receive documents, materials, communications, 24        or information, including otherwise confidential and 25        privileged documents, materials, or information, from 26        the NAIC and its affiliates or subsidiaries, and from   HB3799 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1        regulatory and law enforcement officials of other 2        State, federal, alien, or international jurisdictions, 3        authorities, and agencies, and shall maintain as 4        confidential or privileged any document, material, 5        communication, or information received with notice or 6        the understanding that it is confidential or 7        privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is 8        the source of the document, material, communication, 9        or information; and10            (C) enter into agreements governing the sharing 11        and use of information consistent with this Section.12        (4) Nothing in this Section limits:13            (A) the Director's authority to use, if consistent 14        with subsection (5) of Section 188.1, as applicable, 15        any final or preliminary examination report, any 16        market conduct surveillance or examinee work papers or 17        other documents, or any other information discovered 18        or developed during the course of any market conduct 19        surveillance in the furtherance of any legal or 20        regulatory action initiated by the Director that the 21        Director may, in the Director's sole discretion, deem 22        appropriate; however, confidential or privileged 23        information about a company or person that is used in 24        the legal or regulatory action shall not be made 25        public except by order of a court of competent 26        jurisdiction or with the written consent of the   HB3799 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1        company or person; or2            (B) the ability of an examinee to conduct 3        discovery in accordance with paragraph (3) of 4        subsection (g).5        (5) Disclosure to or by the Director of documents, 6    materials, communications, or information required as part 7    of any type of market conduct surveillance does not waive 8    any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in 9    the documents, materials, communications, or information.10        (6) Notwithstanding the confidentiality requirements 11    of this Section or otherwise imposed by State law, if the 12    Director performs a data call, other than the collection 13    of data for the NAIC market conduct annual statement, the 14    Director may make the results of the data call available 15    for public inspection in an aggregated format that does 16    not disclose information or data attributed to any 17    specific company or person, including the name of any 18    company or person who responded to the data call, so long 19    as the Director provides all companies or persons that 20    responded to the data call 15 days' notice identifying the 21    information to be publicly released. Nothing in this 22    Section requires the Director to publish results from any 23    data call. A data call does not need a warrant or a final 24    report. Failure to comply with a data call may result in a 25    fine up to $10,000 per day per offense. 26    (j) Corrective actions.  HB3799 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1        (1) As a result of any market conduct action, the 2    Director may take any action the Director considers 3    necessary or appropriate in accordance with the report of 4    examination or any hearing thereon for acts in violation 5    of any law, rule, or prior lawful order of the Director. No 6    corrective action, including a penalty, shall be ordered 7    with respect to violations in transactions with consumers 8    or other entities that are isolated occurrences or that 9    occur with such low frequency as to fall below a 10    reasonable margin of error. Such actions include, but are 11    not limited to:12            (A) requiring the regulated person to undertake 13        corrective actions to cease and desist an identified 14        violation or institute processes and practices to 15        comply with applicable standards;16            (B) requiring reimbursement or restitution of any 17        actual losses or damages to persons harmed by the 18        regulated person's violation with interest from the 19        date that the actual loss or damage was incurred, 20        which shall be calculated at the SOFR rate applicable 21        on the date that the actual loss or damage was incurred 22        plus 2%; and23            (C) imposing civil penalties as provided in this 24        subsection (j).25        (2) The Director may order a penalty of up to $2,000 26    for each violation of any law, rule, or prior lawful order   HB3799 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    of the Director. Any failure to respond to an information 2    request in a market conduct action or violation of 3    subsection (d) may carry a fine of up to $10,000 per day 4    per offense $1,000 per day up to a maximum of $50,000. The 5    penalty shall be paid into the Insurance Producer 6    Administration Fund. Fines and penalties shall be 7    consistent, reasonable, and justifiable, and the Director 8    may consider reasonable criteria in ordering the fines and 9    penalties, including, but not limited to, consumer harm, 10    the intentionality of any violations, or remedial actions 11    already undertaken by the examinee. The Director shall 12    communicate to the examinee the basis for any assessed 13    fine or penalty.14        (3) If any other provision of this Code or any other 15    law or rule under the Director's jurisdiction prescribes 16    an amount or range of monetary penalty for a violation of a 17    particular statute or rule or a maximum penalty in the 18    aggregate for repeated violations, the Director shall 19    assess penalties pursuant to the terms of the statute or 20    rule allowing the largest penalty.21        (4) If any other provision of this Code or any other 22    law or rule under the Director's jurisdiction prescribes 23    or specifies a method by which the Director is to 24    determine a violation, then compliance with the process 25    set forth herein shall be deemed to comply with the method 26    prescribed or specified in the other provision.  HB3799 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1        (5) If the Director imposes any sanctions or 2    corrective actions described in subparagraphs (A) through 3    (C) of paragraph (1) of this subsection (j) based on the 4    final report, the Director shall include those actions in 5    a proposed stipulation and consent order enclosed with the 6    final report issued to the examinee under subsection (f). 7    The examinee shall have 10 days to sign the order or 8    request a hearing in writing on the actions proposed in 9    the order regardless of whether the examinee requests a 10    hearing on the contents of the report under subsection 11    (f). If the examinee does not sign the order or request a 12    hearing on the proposed actions or the final report within 13    10 days, the Director may issue a final order imposing the 14    sanctions or corrective actions. Nothing in this Section 15    prevents the Department from sharing an earlier draft of 16    the proposed order with the examinee before issuing the 17    final report.18        (6) If the examinee accepts the order and the final 19    report, the Director shall hold the content of the order 20    and report as private and confidential for a period of 30 21    days. Thereafter, the Director shall open the order and 22    report for public inspection.23        (7) If the examinee makes a timely request for a 24    hearing on the order, the request must specify the 25    sanctions or corrective actions in the order that the 26    examinee is challenging. Any hearing shall follow the   HB3799 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    procedures set forth in paragraphs (2) through (7) of 2    subsection (g).3        (8) If the examinee has also requested a hearing on 4    the contents of the report, then that hearing shall be 5    consolidated with the hearing on the order. The Director 6    shall not impose sanctions or corrective actions under 7    this Section until the conclusion of the hearing.8        (9) The Director shall issue a decision accompanied by 9    findings and conclusions along with any corrective actions 10    or sanctions. Any sanctions or corrective actions shall be 11    based on the final report accepted by the examinee or 12    adopted by the Director under paragraph (9) of subsection 13    (g). The Director's order is a final administrative 14    decision and shall be served upon the examinee together 15    with a copy of the final report within 90 days after the 16    conclusion of the hearing or within 10 days after the 17    examinee's acceptance of the proposed order and final 18    report, as applicable. The hearing is deemed concluded on 19    the later of the last date of any live hearing or the final 20    deadline date for written submissions to the hearing 21    officer, including any continuances or supplemental 22    briefings permitted by the hearing officer.23        (10) If an examinee has requested a hearing under this 24    subsection (i), the Director shall continue to hold the 25    final order and examination report as private and 26    confidential for a period of 49 days after the final   HB3799 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    administrative decision. After the 49-day period expires, 2    the Director shall open the final order and examination 3    report if a court of competent jurisdiction has not stayed 4    their publication.5    (k) National market conduct databases. The Director shall 6collect and report market data to the NAIC's market 7information systems, including, but not limited to, the 8Complaint Database System, the Examination Tracking System, 9and the Regulatory Information Retrieval System, or other 10successor NAIC products as determined by the Director. 11Information collected and maintained by the Department for 12inclusion in these NAIC market information systems shall be 13compiled in a manner that meets the requirements of the NAIC. 14Confidential or privileged information collected, reported, or 15maintained under this subsection (k) shall be subject to the 16protections and restrictions on disclosure in subsection (i).17    (l) Immunity of market conduct surveillance personnel.18        (1) No cause of action shall arise nor shall any 19    liability be imposed against the Director, the Director's 20    authorized representatives, market conduct surveillance 21    personnel, or an examiner appointed by the Director for 22    any statements made or conduct performed in good faith 23    while carrying out the provisions of this Section.24        (2) No cause of action shall arise nor shall any 25    liability be imposed against any person for the act of 26    communicating or delivering information or data to the   HB3799 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    Director, the Director's authorized representative, market 2    conduct surveillance personnel, or examiner pursuant to an 3    examination made under this Section, if the act of 4    communication or delivery was performed in good faith and 5    without fraudulent intent or the intent to deceive.6        (3) A person identified in paragraph (1) of this 7    subsection (l) shall be entitled to an award of attorney's 8    fees and costs if he or she is the prevailing party in a 9    civil cause of action for libel, slander, or any other 10    relevant tort arising out of activities in carrying out 11    the provisions of this Section and the party bringing the 12    action was not substantially justified in doing so. As 13    used in this paragraph, a proceeding is substantially 14    justified if it had a reasonable basis in law or fact at 15    the time it was initiated.16        (4) This subsection (l) does not abrogate or modify in 17    any way any common law or statutory privilege or immunity 18    heretofore enjoyed by any person identified in paragraph 19    (1) of this subsection (l). 20(Source: P.A. 103-897, eff. 1-1-25.) 21    (215 ILCS 5/132.3)  (from Ch. 73, par. 744.3)22    Sec. 132.3. Authority, scope, and scheduling of 23examinations. 24    (a) The Director or any of his examiners may conduct an 25examination of any company as often as the Director, in his   HB3799 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1sole discretion, deems appropriate, but shall, at a minimum, 2conduct an examination of every insurer authorized or licensed 3in this State not less frequently than once every 5 years. In 4scheduling and determining the nature, scope, and frequency of 5the examinations, the Director shall consider the results of 6financial statement analyses and ratios, changes in management 7or ownership, actuarial opinions, reports of independent 8certified public accountants and other criteria set forth in 9the Examiners' Handbook adopted by the National Association of 10Insurance Commissioners and in effect when the Director 11exercises discretion under this subsection.12    (b) For purposes of completing an examination of any 13company, the Director may examine or investigate any person, 14or the business of any person, insofar as the examination or 15investigation is, in the sole discretion of the Director, 16necessary or material to the examination of the company.17    (b-5) The Director may issue a data call to any company to 18collect any information within that company or its affiliate's 19control. If an insurer fails to comply with the data call, the 20Director may assess a fine up to $10,000 per day per offense. A 21data call does not require an examination warrant or a final 22report. Any information provided through a data call shall be 23treated as confidential and privileged. The information shall 24not be subject to subpoena or discovery and shall not be 25admissible into evidence in any private civil action. No 26waiver of privilege or confidentiality shall occur as a result   HB3799 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1of responding to such data call. 2    (c) In lieu of an examination of any foreign or alien 3insurer authorized or licensed in this State, the Director may 4accept an examination report on the company as prepared by the 5insurance department for the company's state of domicile or 6port-of-entry state until January 1, 1994. Thereafter, those 7reports may only be accepted if (1) the insurance department 8was at the time of the examination accredited under the 9National Association of Insurance Commissioners' Financial 10Regulation Standards and Accreditation Program, (2) the 11examination is performed under the supervision of an 12accredited insurance department or with the participation of 13one or more examiners who are employed by an accredited state 14insurance department, and who, after a review of the 15examination work papers and report, state under oath that the 16examination was performed in a manner consistent with the 17standards and procedures required by their insurance 18department, or (3) the Director otherwise determines that the 19examination was performed in a manner substantially similar to 20the standards and procedures required by Sections 132.1 21through 132.6 of this Code.22    (d) Any company that or person who violates or aids and 23abets any violation of a written order issued under this 24Section is guilty of a business offense and may be fined up to 25$10,000 per day per offense. The penalty shall be paid into the 26Insurance Producer Administration Fund.   HB3799 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1(Source: P.A. 89-97, eff. 7-7-95.) 2    (215 ILCS 5/143.15)  (from Ch. 73, par. 755.15)3    Sec. 143.15. Mailing of cancellation notice. All notices 4of cancellation of insurance as defined in subsections (a), 5(b) and (c) of Section 143.13 must be mailed at least 30 days 6prior to the effective date of cancellation to the named 7insured if the effective date of cancellation is within the 8first 60 days of coverage. After the coverage has been 9effective for 61 days or more, all notices must be mailed at 10least 60 days prior to the effective date of cancellation. 11However ; however, if cancellation is for nonpayment of 12premium, the notice of cancellation must be mailed at least 10 13days before the effective date of the cancellation to the last 14mailing address known to the company. All notices of 15cancellation to the named insured shall include a specific 16explanation of the reason or reasons for cancellation. For 17purposes of this Section, the mortgagee or lien holder, if 18known, may opt to accept notification electronically. 19(Source: P.A. 100-475, eff. 1-1-18.) 20    (215 ILCS 5/143.17)  (from Ch. 73, par. 755.17)21    Sec. 143.17. Notice of intention not to renew. 22    a. No company shall fail to renew any policy of insurance, 23as defined in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (h) of Section 24143.13, to which Section 143.11 applies, unless it shall send   HB3799 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1by mail to the named insured at least 60 30 days advance notice 2of its intention not to renew. The company shall maintain 3proof of mailing of such notice on a recognized U.S. Post 4Office form or a form acceptable to the U. S. Post Office or 5other commercial mail delivery service. The nonrenewal shall 6not become effective until at least 60 30 days from the proof 7of mailing date of the notice to the name insured. 8Notification shall also be sent to the insured's broker, if 9known, or the agent of record, if known, and to the last known 10mortgagee or lien holder. For purposes of this Section, the 11mortgagee or lien holder, insured's broker, or the agent of 12record may opt to accept notification electronically. However, 13where cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, the notice of 14cancellation must be mailed at least 10 days before the 15effective date of the cancellation.16    b. This Section does not apply if the company has 17manifested its willingness to renew directly to the named 18insured. Such written notice shall specify the premium amount 19payable, including any premium payment plan available, and the 20name of any person or persons, if any, authorized to receive 21payment on behalf of the company. If no person is so 22authorized, the premium notice shall so state.23    b-5. This Section does not apply if the company manifested 24its willingness to renew directly to the named insured. 25However, no company may impose changes in deductibles or 26coverage for any policy forms applicable to an entire line of   HB3799 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1business enumerated in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (h) of 2Section 143.13 to which Section 143.11 applies unless the 3company mails to the named insured written notice of the 4change in deductible or coverage at least 60 days prior to the 5renewal or anniversary date. Notice shall also be sent to the 6insured's broker, if known, or the agent of record.7    c. Should a company fail to comply with (a) or (b) of this 8Section, the policy shall terminate only on the effective date 9of any similar insurance procured by the insured with respect 10to the same subject or location designated in both policies.11    d. Renewal of a policy does not constitute a waiver or 12estoppel with respect to grounds for cancellation which 13existed before the effective date of such renewal.14    e. In all notices of intention not to renew any policy of 15insurance, as defined in Section 143.11 the company shall 16provide the named insured a specific explanation of the 17reasons for nonrenewal.18    f. For purposes of this Section, the insured's broker, if 19known, or the agent of record and the mortgagee or lien holder 20may opt to accept notification electronically. 21(Source: P.A. 100-475, eff. 1-1-18.) 22    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII heading new)23ARTICLE XLVIII. CLIMATE RISK DISCLOSURE 24    (215 ILCS 5/1801 new)  HB3799 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 11270 BAB 21355 b1    Sec. 1801. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 2Climate Risk Disclosure Law. 3    (215 ILCS 5/1805 new)4    Sec. 1805. Purpose. The purpose of this Article is to 5enhance transparency about how insurers manage climate-related 6risks and to clarify the Department's authority to require 7companies to participate in climate surveys issued by entities 8including but not limited to the Department and the National 9Association of Insurance Commissioners. This Article shall be 10liberally interpreted to carry into effect the intent of this 11Section. 12    (215 ILCS 5/1810 new)13    Sec. 1810. Applicability. This Article applies to all 14companies licensed in Illinois under Classes 2 and 3 of 15Section 4 of this Code that write $100,000,000 or more 16annually in premiums. This threshold may be altered by rule. 17    (215 ILCS 5/1815 new)18    Sec. 1815. Climate disclosure survey participation. All 19insurers subject to this Article shall, upon direction from 20the Department, participate in National Association of 21Insurance Commissioners issued climate surveys.